Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska33-114.01
County treasurer; counties more than 100,000 inhabitants and less than 400,000 inhabitants; services of electronic data processing equipment; fees.

In any county having a population of more than one hundred thousand and less than four hundred thousand inhabitants as determined by the most recent federal decennial census, when such county has entered into an agreement with the county seat for it to provide the services of its electronic data processing equipment for the purposes of tax collection, the county treasurer shall receive from such city for services provided in the assessment and collection of taxes the amount provided by agreement between the county and such city.

Laws 1973, LB 244, § 1;

Laws 2016, LB742, § 20.